Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated  to the Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $760,506.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $9,841
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Advocacy Com-
missions Office.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House May 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 6, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5001 (HB 5001-A) Page 1